test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-nusjTS_gt-norm.yaml
     нусь+V+IV+Ger: нусь
     нусь+V+IV+GerFin: нуванзь
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Nom+Sg+Abs: нува
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Acc+Sg+Abs: нувам’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Gen+Sg+Abs: нува’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Dat+Sg+Abs: нуван’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Loc+Sg+Abs: нувахана
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Abl+Sg+Abs: нувахад
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pros+Sg+Abs: нувавна
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Nom+Du+Abs: нуваха’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Acc+Du+Abs: нуваха’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Gen+Du+Abs: нуваха’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Nom+Pl+Abs: нува”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Acc+Pl+Abs: нуби
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Gen+Pl+Abs: нуби”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Dat+Pl+Abs: нуваха”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Loc+Pl+Abs: нуваха”на
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Abl+Pl+Abs: нувахат
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pros+Pl+Abs: нуби”мана
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [нував, нувами]
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [нував, нувами]
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [нуван, нувани]
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [нувахан, нувахани]
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [нуваханан, нуваханани]
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [нувахадан, нувахадани, нувахадни]
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [нувавнан, нувавнани]
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [нувахаюн, нувахаюни]
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [нувахаюн, нувахаюни]
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [нувахаюн, нувахаюни]
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [нубин, нубини]
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [нубин, нубини]
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: [нуби”н, нуби”ни]
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: [нуваха”н, нуваха”ни]
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [нуваха”нан, нуваха”нани]
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [нувахатан, нувахатани, нувахатни]
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: [нуби”манан, нуби”манани]
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: нувар
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: нувамд
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: нуванд
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: нуваханд
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: нувахананд
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: нувахаданд
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: нувавнанд
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxSg2: нувахаюд
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxSg2: нувахаюд
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxSg2: нувахают
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: нубид
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: нубид
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: нубит
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: нувахат
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: нуваха”нат
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: нувахатат
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: нуби”манат
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: нувада
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: нувамда
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: нуванда
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: нуваханда
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: нувахананда
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: нувахаданда
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: нувавнанда
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxSg3: нувахаюда
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxSg3: нувахаюда
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxSg3: нувахаюта
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: нубида
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: нубида
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: нубита
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: нувахата
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: нуваха”ната
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [нувахатата, нувахатта]
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: нуби”маната
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: нувами’
#     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxSg1.2: нувами
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: нувами’
#     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxSg1.2: нувами
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: нувани’
#     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxSg1.2: нувани
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: нувахани’
#     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxSg1.2: нувахани
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: нуваханани’
#     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxSg1.2: нуваханани
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: [нувахадани’, нувахадни’]
#     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxSg1.2: [нувахадани, нувахадни]
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: нувавнани’
#     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxSg1.2: нувавнани
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxDu1: нувахаюни’
#     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxSg1.2: нувахаюни
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxDu1: нувахаюни’
#     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxSg1.2: нувахаюни
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxDu1: нувахаюни’
#     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxSg1.2: нувахаюни
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: нубини’
#     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxSg1.2: нубини
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: нубини’
#     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxSg1.2: нубини
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: нуби”ни’
#     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxSg1.2: нуби”ни
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: нуваха”ни’
#     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxSg1.2: нуваха”ни
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: нуваха”нани’
#     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxSg1.2: нуваха”нани
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: [нувахатани’, нувахатни’]
#     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxSg1.2: [нувахатани, нувахатни]
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: нуби”манани’
#     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxSg1.2: нуби”манани
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: нувари’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: нувамди’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: нуванди’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: нуваханди’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: нувахананди’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: нувахаданди’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: нувавнанди’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxDu2: нувахаюди’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxDu2: нувахаюди’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxDu2: нувахаюти’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: нубиди’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: нубиди’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: нубити’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: нувахати’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: нуваха”нати’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: [нувахатати’, нувахатти’]
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: нуби”манати’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: нувади’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: нувамди’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: нуванди’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: нуваханди’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: нувахананди’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: нувахаданди’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: нувавнанди’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxDu3: нувахаюди’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxDu3: нувахаюди’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxDu3: нувахаюти’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: нубиди’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: нубиди’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: нубити’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: нувахати’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: нуваха”нати’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: [нувахатати’, нувахатти’]
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: нуби”манати’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: нувава”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: нувава”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: нувана”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: нувахана”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: нуваханана”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: [нувахадана”, нувахадна”]
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: нувавнана”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxPl1: нувахаюна”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxPl1: нувахаюна”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxPl1: нувахаюна”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: нубина”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: нубина”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: нуби”на”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: нуваха”на”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: нуваха”нана”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: [нувахатана”, нувахатна”]
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: нуби”манана”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: нувара”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: нувамда”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: нуванда”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: нуваханда”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: нувахананда”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: нувахаданда”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: нувавнанда”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxPl2: нувахаюда”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxPl2: нувахаюда”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxPl2: нувахаюта”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: нубида”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: нубида”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: нубита”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: нувахата”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: нуваха”ната”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: [нувахатата”, нувахатта”]
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: нуби”маната”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: нувадо’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: нувамдо’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: нувандо’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: нувахандо’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: нуваханандо’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: нувахадандо’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: нувавнандо’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxPl3: нувахаюдо’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxPl3: нувахаюдо’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxPl3: нувахаюто’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: нубидо’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: нубидо’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: нубито’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: нувахато’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: нуваха”нато’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: [нувахатато’, нувахатто’]
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: нуби”манато’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pred+Abs: нувад
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [нувадав, нувадув, нувадами]
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [нувадав, нувадув, нувадами]
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [нувадан, нувадани]
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: нувадар
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: нувадамд
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: нуваданд
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: нувадада
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: нувадамда
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: нуваданда
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: нувадами’
#     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxSg1.2: нувадами
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: нувадами’
#     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxSg1.2: нувадами
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: нувадани’
#     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxSg1.2: нувадани
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: нувадари’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: нувадамди’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: нуваданди’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: нувадади’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: нувадамди’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: нуваданди’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: нувадава”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: нувадава”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: нувадана”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: нувадара”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: нувадамда”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: нуваданда”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: нувададо’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: нувадамдо’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: нувадандо’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScSg1: нувадм’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScSg2: нуван
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScSg3: нува
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScDu1: нувани’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScDu2: нувади’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScDu3: нуваха’
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScPl1: нувава”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScPl2: нувада”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScPl3: нува”
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScSg1: нувадамзь
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScSg2: нуванась
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScSg3: нувась
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScDu1: нуванинзь
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScDu2: нувадинзь
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScDu3: нуваханзь
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScPl1: нуваваць
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScPl2: нувадаць
     нусь+V+IV+InfImprf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScPl3: нуваць
